West Virginia, session 2026, SB199.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. wildlife resources §20-2-65. Waiver of fees for emergency responders disabled in the line of duty applying for hunting, trapping, and fishing licenses. (a) For any emergency responder who has been found to be totally disabled in the line of duty, the fee to obtain the license or permit that would otherwise be required by the director by legislative rules issued pursuant to §20-2-42 of this code is waived. (b) As used in this section, "emergency responder" has the same definition as defined in §5H-1-2 of this code. (c) Any emergency responder seeking a fee waiver must submit the following:(1) An affidavit signed by the applicant's department or agency head stating that the emergency responder has been found to be totally disabled due to circumstances which occurred in the line of duty.  (2) Any other information required by the director for issuance of the license.(d) The director may propose rules for legislative approval in accordance with the provisions of §29A-3-1 et seq. setting forth application and processing procedures.